Utah statutes.
31A-2-209.   Access to state records.

Subject to Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, the commissioner shall have access to the records of any agency of the state government or of any political subdivision of the state which the commissioner may consult in discharging the commissioner's duties.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

